Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 3. Revised Uniform Arbitration Act.

Cross references. —

For a saving clause declaring that AS

09.43.300

—

09.43.595

do not affect an action or proceeding commenced or right accrued before January 1, 2005, see § 10, ch. 170, SLA 2004 in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts.

For the Uniform Arbitration Act, see AS

09.43.010

—

09.43.180

.

Sec. 09.43.300.
Application.

AS

09.43.300

—

09.43.595

govern an agreement to arbitrate made on or after January 1, 2005.

AS

09.43.300

—

09.43.595

govern an agreement to arbitrate made before January 1, 2005, if all the parties to the agreement or to the arbitration proceeding agree in a record that AS

09.43.300

—

09.43.595

govern the agreement.

Except as provided by (d) of this section, AS

09.43.300

—

09.43.595

do not apply to a labor-management contract unless they are incorporated into the contract or their application is provided for by contract.

AS

09.43.300

—

09.43.595

do not apply to a collective bargaining agreement subject to AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

, except as provided by AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

.

A person may not waive the effective date of a provision of AS

09.43.300

—

09.43.595

, and a waiver of the effective date of a provision of AS

09.43.300

—

09.43.595

is void.

History.

(§§ 2, 9 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (e) was enacted as § 9, ch. 170, SLA 2004, and codified as a part of this section in 2004.

Sec. 09.43.310.
Effect of agreement to arbitrate; nonwaivable provisions.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) and (c) of this section, a party to an agreement to arbitrate or arbitration proceeding may waive, or the parties may vary the effect of, the requirements of AS

09.43.300

—

09.43.595

to the extent permitted by law.

Before a controversy arises that is subject to an agreement to arbitrate, a party to the agreement may not

waive or agree to vary the effect of the requirements of AS

09.43.320

,

09.43.330(a)

or (b),

09.43.350

,

09.43.440(a)

or (b),

09.43.530

, or

09.43.550

;

agree to unreasonably restrict the right under AS

09.43.360

to notice of the initiation of an arbitration proceeding;

agree to unreasonably restrict the right under AS

09.43.390

to disclosure of any facts by a neutral arbitrator; or

waive the right under AS

09.43.430

of a party to an agreement to arbitrate to be represented by an attorney at a proceeding or hearing under AS

09.43.300

—

09.43.595

, but an employer and a labor organization may waive the right to representation by an attorney in a labor arbitration.

A party to an agreement to arbitrate or arbitration proceeding may not waive, or the parties may not vary the effect of, the requirements of this section, AS

09.43.300(a)

, (c), or (d),

09.43.340

,

09.43.410

,

09.43.450

,

09.43.470(d)

or (e),

09.43.490

,

09.43.500

,

09.43.510

,

09.43.520

,

09.43.560

, or

09.43.570

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.320.
Application for judicial relief.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

09.43.550

, an application for judicial relief under AS

09.43.300

—

09.43.595

shall be made and heard in the manner provided by the court rules of this state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.330.
Validity of agreement to arbitrate.

An agreement contained in a record to submit to arbitration an existing or subsequent controversy arising between the parties to the agreement is valid, enforceable, and irrevocable except upon a ground that exists at law or in equity for the revocation of a contract, and except as provided by (b) of this section.

To the extent an agreement that contains an arbitration provision is invalidated on the grounds that a party was induced into entering into the agreement by fraud, the arbitration provision in the agreement is not enforceable, and the party is not required to prove that the party was induced into entering into the arbitration provision by fraud.

The court shall decide whether an agreement to arbitrate exists or a controversy is subject to an agreement to arbitrate.

An arbitrator shall decide whether a condition precedent to arbitrability has been fulfilled.

If a party to a judicial proceeding challenges the existence of, or claims that a controversy is not subject to, an agreement to arbitrate, the arbitration proceeding may continue pending final resolution of the issue by the court, unless the court otherwise orders.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.340.
Application to compel arbitration; stay of related proceedings.

On application of a person showing an agreement to arbitrate and alleging another person’s refusal to arbitrate under the agreement,

if the refusing party does not appear or does not oppose the application, the court shall order the parties to arbitrate; and

if the refusing party opposes the application, the court shall proceed summarily to decide the issue and order the parties to arbitrate unless it finds that there is no enforceable agreement to arbitrate.

On application of a person alleging that an arbitration proceeding has been initiated or threatened but that there is not an agreement to arbitrate, the court shall proceed summarily to decide the issue. If the court finds that there is an enforceable agreement to arbitrate, the court shall order the parties to arbitrate.

If the court finds that there is not an enforceable agreement, the court may not, under (a) or (b) of this section, order the parties to arbitrate.

The court may not refuse to order arbitration because the claim subject to arbitration lacks merit or because grounds for the claim have not been established.

If a proceeding involving a claim referable to arbitration under an alleged agreement to arbitrate is pending in court, an application under this section shall be made in that court. Otherwise, an application under this section may be made in any court as provided in AS

09.43.540

.

If a party makes an application to the court to order arbitration, the court shall, on just terms, stay a judicial proceeding that involves a claim alleged to be subject to the arbitration until the court renders a final decision under this section.

If the court orders arbitration, the court shall, on just terms, stay a judicial proceeding that involves a claim subject to the arbitration. If a claim subject to the arbitration is severable, the court may limit the stay to that claim.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.350.
Provisional remedies.

Before an arbitrator is appointed and is authorized and able to act, the court, upon application of a party to an arbitration proceeding and for good cause shown, may enter an order for provisional remedies to protect the effectiveness of the arbitration proceeding to the same extent and under the same conditions as if the controversy were the subject of a civil action.

After an arbitrator is appointed and is authorized and able to act,

the arbitrator may issue the orders for provisional remedies, including interim awards, that the arbitrator finds necessary to protect the effectiveness of the arbitration proceeding and to promote the fair and expeditious resolution of the controversy, to the same extent and under the same conditions as if the controversy were the subject of a civil action; and

a party to an arbitration proceeding may apply to the court for a provisional remedy only if the matter is urgent and the arbitrator is not able to act timely or the arbitrator cannot provide an adequate remedy.

A party does not waive a right of arbitration by making an application under (a) or (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.360.
Initiation of arbitration.

A person initiates an arbitration proceeding by giving notice in a record to the other parties to the agreement to arbitrate in the agreed manner between the parties or, in the absence of agreement, by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested and obtained, or by service as authorized for the commencement of a civil action. The notice must describe the nature of the controversy and the remedy sought.

Unless a person objects for lack or insufficiency of notice under AS

09.43.420(c)

not later than the beginning of the arbitration hearing, the person, by appearing at the hearing, waives any objection to lack or insufficiency of notice.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.370.
Consolidation of separate arbitration proceedings.

Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this section, upon application of a party to an agreement to arbitrate or arbitration proceeding, the court may order consolidation of separate arbitration proceedings as to all or some of the claims if

there are separate agreements to arbitrate or separate arbitration proceedings between the same persons or one of them is a party to a separate agreement to arbitrate or a separate arbitration proceeding with a third person;

the claims subject to the agreements to arbitrate arise in substantial part from the same transaction or series of related transactions;

the existence of a common issue of law or fact creates the possibility of conflicting decisions in the separate arbitration proceedings; and

prejudice resulting from a failure to consolidate is not outweighed by the risk of undue delay or prejudice to the rights of or hardship to parties opposing consolidation.

The court may order consolidation of separate arbitration proceedings as to some claims and allow other claims to be resolved in separate arbitration proceedings.

The court may not order consolidation of the claims of a party to an agreement to arbitrate if the agreement prohibits consolidation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 8(a), ch. 170, SLA 2004 provides that the 2004 enactment of this section has the effect of amending Rules 18 - 21, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, by establishing additional specific situations where the court may order proceedings consolidated as to all or some claims, and a situation where the court is prohibited from ordering consolidation.

Sec. 09.43.380.
Appointment of arbitrator; service as a neutral arbitrator.

If the parties to an agreement to arbitrate agree on a method for appointing an arbitrator, that method shall be followed, unless the method fails. If the parties have not agreed on a method, the agreed method fails, or an arbitrator appointed fails or is unable to act and a successor has not been appointed, the court, on application of a party to the arbitration proceeding, shall appoint the arbitrator. An arbitrator appointed by the court has all the powers of an arbitrator designated in the agreement to arbitrate or appointed under the agreed method.

An individual who has a known, direct, and material interest in the outcome of the arbitration proceeding or a known, existing, and substantial relationship with a party may not serve as an arbitrator required by an agreement to be neutral.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.390.
Disclosure by arbitrator.

Before accepting appointment, an individual who is requested to serve as an arbitrator shall, after making a reasonable inquiry, disclose to all parties to the agreement to arbitrate and arbitration proceeding and to other arbitrators any known facts that a reasonable person would consider likely to affect the impartiality of the arbitrator in the arbitration proceeding, including

a financial or personal interest in the outcome of the arbitration proceeding; and

an existing or past relationship with a party to the agreement to arbitrate or arbitration proceeding, counsel for or representatives of the parties, a witness, or another arbitrator.

An arbitrator has a continuing obligation to disclose to all parties to the agreement to arbitrate and arbitration proceeding and to other arbitrators any facts that the arbitrator learns after accepting appointment that a reasonable person would consider likely to affect the impartiality of the arbitrator.

If an arbitrator discloses a fact required by (a) or (b) of this section to be disclosed and a party timely objects to the appointment or continued service of the arbitrator based on the fact disclosed, the objection may be a ground under AS

09.43.500(a)(2)

for vacating an award made by the arbitrator.

If the arbitrator did not disclose a fact as required by (a) or (b) of this section, upon timely objection by a party, the court may, under AS

09.43.500(a)(2)

, vacate an award.

An arbitrator appointed as a neutral arbitrator who does not disclose a known, direct, and material interest in the outcome of the arbitration proceeding or a known, existing, and substantial relationship with a party is rebuttably presumed to act with evident partiality under AS

09.43.500(a)(2)

.

If the parties to an arbitration proceeding agree to the procedures of an arbitration organization or other procedures for challenges to arbitrators before an award is made, substantial compliance with those procedures is a condition precedent to an application to vacate an award on that ground under AS

09.43.500(a)(2)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.400.
Action by majority.

If there is more than one arbitrator, the powers of an arbitrator shall be exercised by a majority of the arbitrators, but all of them shall conduct the hearing under AS

09.43.420(c)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.410.
Immunity of arbitrator; competency to testify; attorney fees and costs.

An arbitrator or an arbitration organization acting in that capacity is immune from civil liability to the same extent as a judge of a court of this state acting in a judicial capacity.

The immunity afforded by this section supplements any immunity under other law.

The failure of an arbitrator to make a disclosure required by AS

09.43.390

does not cause a loss of immunity under this section.

In a judicial, administrative, or similar proceeding, an arbitrator or representative of an arbitration organization is not competent to testify and may not be required to produce records as to a statement, conduct, a decision, or a ruling occurring during the arbitration proceeding to the same extent as a judge of a court of this state acting in a judicial capacity. This subsection does not apply to

the extent necessary to determine the claim of an arbitrator, arbitration organization, or representative of the arbitration organization against a party to the arbitration proceeding; or

a hearing on an application to vacate an award under AS

09.43.500(a)(1)

or (2) if the applicant establishes prima facie that a ground for vacating the award exists.

If a person commences a civil action against an arbitrator, arbitration organization, or representative of an arbitration organization arising from the services of the arbitrator, organization, or representative, or if a person seeks to compel an arbitrator or a representative of an arbitration organization to testify or produce records in violation of (d) of this section, and the court decides that the arbitrator, arbitration organization, or representative of an arbitration organization is immune from civil liability or that the arbitrator or representative of the organization is not competent to testify, the court shall award to the arbitrator, organization, or representative attorney fees and expenses of litigation as determined under the court rules of this state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 8(b), ch. 170, SLA 2004 provides that the 2004 enactment of (d) and (e) of this section have the effect of amending Rule 601, Alaska Rules of Evidence, by providing that an arbitrator and a representative of an arbitration organization are not competent to testify in certain judicial proceedings related to arbitration.

Sec. 09.43.420.
Arbitration process.

An arbitrator may conduct an arbitration in the manner the arbitrator considers appropriate for a fair and expeditious disposition of the proceeding. The authority conferred upon the arbitrator includes the power to hold conferences with the parties to the arbitration proceeding before the hearing and, among other matters, determine the admissibility, relevance, materiality, and weight of any evidence.

An arbitrator may decide a request for summary disposition of a claim or particular issue

if all interested parties agree; or

on request of one party to the arbitration proceeding if that party gives notice to all other parties to the proceeding and the other parties have a reasonable opportunity to respond.

If an arbitrator orders a hearing, the arbitrator shall set a time and place and give notice of the hearing not less than five days before the hearing begins. Unless a party to the arbitration proceeding makes an objection to lack or insufficiency of notice not later than the beginning of the hearing, the party’s appearance at the hearing waives the objection. On request of a party to the arbitration proceeding and for good cause shown, or on the arbitrator’s own initiative, the arbitrator may adjourn the hearing from time to time as necessary but may not postpone the hearing to a time later than that fixed by the agreement to arbitrate for making the award unless the parties to the arbitration proceeding consent to a later date. The arbitrator may hear and decide the controversy on the evidence produced although a party who was notified of the arbitration proceeding did not appear. The court, on request, may direct the arbitrator to conduct the hearing promptly and render a timely decision.

At a hearing under (c) of this section, a party to the arbitration proceeding has a right to be heard, to present evidence material to the controversy, and to cross-examine witnesses appearing at the hearing.

If an arbitrator ceases acting or is unable to act during the arbitration proceeding, a replacement arbitrator shall be appointed under AS

09.43.380

to continue the proceeding and to resolve the controversy.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.430.
Representation by attorney.

A party to an arbitration proceeding may be represented by an attorney.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.440.
Witnesses; subpoenas; depositions; discovery.

An arbitrator may issue a subpoena for the attendance of a witness and for the production of records and other evidence at a hearing and may administer oaths. A subpoena shall be served in the manner for service of subpoenas in a civil action and, on application to the court by a party to the arbitration proceeding or the arbitrator, enforced in the manner for enforcement of subpoenas in a civil action.

In order to make the proceedings fair, expeditious, and cost-effective, on request of a party to or witness in an arbitration proceeding, an arbitrator may permit a deposition of a witness to be taken for use as evidence at the hearing, including a witness who cannot be subpoenaed for or is unable to attend a hearing. The arbitrator shall determine the conditions under which the deposition is taken.

An arbitrator may permit the discovery the arbitrator decides is appropriate in the circumstances, taking into account the needs of the parties to the arbitration proceeding and other affected persons and the desirability of making the proceeding fair, expeditious, and cost-effective.

If an arbitrator permits discovery under (c) of this section, the arbitrator may order a party to the arbitration proceeding to comply with the arbitrator’s discovery-related orders, issue subpoenas for the attendance of a witness and for the production of records and other evidence at a discovery proceeding, and take action against a noncomplying party to the extent a court could if the controversy were the subject of a civil action in this state.

An arbitrator may issue a protective order to prevent the disclosure of privileged information, confidential information, trade secrets, and other information protected from disclosure to the extent a court could if the controversy were the subject of a civil action in this state.

All laws compelling a person under subpoena to testify and all fees for attending a judicial proceeding, deposition, or discovery proceeding as a witness apply to an arbitration proceeding as if the controversy were the subject of a civil action in this state.

The court may enforce a subpoena or discovery-related order for the attendance of a witness within this state and for the production of records and other evidence issued by an arbitrator in connection with an arbitration proceeding in another state upon conditions determined by the court so as to make the arbitration proceeding fair, expeditious, and cost-effective. A subpoena or discovery-related order issued by an arbitrator in another state shall be served in the manner provided by law for service of subpoenas in a civil action in this state and, on application to the court by a party to the arbitration proceeding or the arbitrator, enforced in the manner provided by law for enforcement of subpoenas in a civil action in this state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.450.
Judicial enforcement of preaward ruling by arbitrator.

If an arbitrator makes a preaward ruling in favor of a party to the arbitration proceeding, the party may request the arbitrator to incorporate the ruling into an award under AS

09.43.460

. A prevailing party may apply to the court for an expedited order to confirm the award under AS

09.43.490

, in which case the court shall summarily decide the application. The court shall issue an order to confirm the award unless the court vacates, modifies, or corrects the award under AS

09.43.500

or

09.43.510

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.460.
Award.

An arbitrator shall make a record of an award. The record must be signed or otherwise authenticated by an arbitrator who concurs with the award. The arbitrator or the arbitration organization shall give notice of the award, including a copy of the award, to each party to the arbitration proceeding.

An award shall be made within the time specified by the agreement to arbitrate or, if not specified in the agreement, within the time ordered by the court. The court may extend or the parties to the arbitration proceeding may agree in a record to extend the time. The court or the parties may extend the time within or after the time specified or ordered. A party waives an objection that an award was not timely made unless the party gives notice of the objection to the arbitrator before receiving notice of the award.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.470.
Change of award by arbitrator.

On motion to an arbitrator by a party to an arbitration proceeding, the arbitrator may modify or correct an award

on a ground stated in AS

09.43.510(a)(1)

or (3);

because the arbitrator has not made a final and definite award on a claim submitted by the parties to the arbitration proceeding; or

to clarify the award.

A motion under (a) of this section shall be made and notice shall be given to all parties within 20 days after the movant receives notice of the award.

A party to the arbitration proceeding shall give notice of an objection to the motion within 10 days after receipt of the notice.

If an application to the court is pending under AS

09.43.490

,

09.43.500

, or

09.43.510

, the court may submit the claim to the arbitrator to consider whether to modify or correct the award

on a ground stated in AS

09.43.510(a)(1)

or (3);

because the arbitrator has not made a final and definite award on a claim submitted by the parties to the arbitration proceeding; or

to clarify the award.

An award modified or corrected under this section is subject to AS

09.43.460(a)

and

09.43.490

—

09.43.510

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.480.
Remedies; fees and expenses of arbitration proceeding.

An arbitrator may award punitive damages or other exemplary relief if the award is authorized by law in a civil action involving the same claim and the evidence produced at the hearing justifies the award under the legal standards otherwise applicable to the claim.

An arbitrator may award reasonable attorney fees and other reasonable expenses of arbitration if the award is authorized by law in a civil action involving the same claim or by the agreement of the parties to the arbitration proceeding.

As to all remedies other than those authorized by (a) and (b) of this section, an arbitrator may order the remedies the arbitrator considers just and appropriate under the circumstances of the arbitration proceeding. The fact that the remedy could not or would not be granted by the court is not a ground for refusing to confirm an award under AS

09.43.490

or for vacating an award under AS

09.43.500

.

An arbitrator’s expenses and fees, together with other expenses, shall be paid as provided in the award.

If an arbitrator awards punitive damages or other exemplary relief under (a) of this section, the arbitrator shall specify in the award the basis in fact justifying and the basis in law authorizing the award and shall state the amount of the punitive damages or other exemplary relief separately.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.490.
Confirmation of award.

After a party to an arbitration proceeding receives notice of an award, the party may apply to the court for an order confirming the award, at which time the court shall issue a confirming order unless the award is modified or corrected under AS

09.43.470

or

09.43.510

or is vacated under AS

09.43.500

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.500.
Vacating award.

On application to the court by a party to an arbitration proceeding, the court shall vacate an award made in the arbitration proceeding if

the award was procured by corruption, fraud, or other undue means;

there was

evident partiality by an arbitrator appointed as a neutral arbitrator;

corruption by an arbitrator; or

misconduct by an arbitrator prejudicing the rights of a party to the arbitration proceeding;

an arbitrator refused to postpone the hearing on showing of sufficient cause for postponement, refused to consider evidence material to the controversy, or otherwise conducted the hearing contrary to AS

09.43.420

, so as to prejudice substantially the rights of a party to the arbitration proceeding;

an arbitrator exceeded the arbitrator’s powers;

there was not an agreement to arbitrate, unless the person participated in the arbitration proceeding without raising the objection under AS

09.43.420(c)

not later than the beginning of the arbitration hearing; or

the arbitration was conducted without proper notice of the initiation of an arbitration as required under AS

09.43.360

so as to prejudice substantially the rights of a party to the arbitration proceeding.

An application under this section shall be filed within 90 days after the applicant receives notice of the award under AS

09.43.460

or within 90 days after the applicant receives notice of a modified or corrected award under AS

09.43.470

, unless the applicant alleges that the award was procured by corruption, fraud, or other undue means, in which case the application shall be made within 90 days after the ground is known or, by the exercise of reasonable care, would have been known by the applicant.

If the court vacates an award on a ground other than that stated in (a)(5) of this section, it may order a rehearing. If the award is vacated on a ground stated in (a)(1) or (2) of this section, the rehearing shall be before a new arbitrator. If the award is vacated on a ground stated in (a)(3), (4), or (6) of this section, the rehearing may be before the arbitrator who made the award or the arbitrator’s successor. The arbitrator shall render the decision in the rehearing within the same time as that provided in AS

09.43.460(b)

for an award.

If the court denies an application to vacate an award, it shall confirm the award unless an application to modify or correct the award is pending.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.510.
Modification or correction of award.

On application made within 90 days after the applicant receives notice of the award under AS

09.43.460

or within 90 days after the applicant receives notice of a modified or corrected award under AS

09.43.470

, the court shall modify or correct the award if

there was an evident mathematical miscalculation or an evident mistake in the description of a person, thing, or property referred to in the award;

the arbitrator has made an award on a claim not submitted to the arbitrator and the award may be corrected without affecting the merits of the decision on the claims submitted; or

the award is imperfect in a matter of form not affecting the merits of the decision on the claims submitted.

If an application made under (a) of this section is granted, the court shall modify or correct and confirm the award as modified or corrected. Otherwise, unless an application to vacate is pending, the court shall confirm the award.

An application to modify or correct an award under this section may be joined with an application to vacate the award.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.520.
Judgment on award.

On granting an order confirming, vacating without directing a rehearing, modifying, or correcting an award, the court shall enter a judgment in conformity with the order. The judgment may be recorded, docketed, and enforced as any other judgment in a civil action.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.530.
Jurisdiction.

A court of this state having jurisdiction over the controversy and the parties may enforce an agreement to arbitrate.

An agreement to arbitrate providing for arbitration in this state confers exclusive jurisdiction on the court to enter judgment on an award under AS

09.43.300

—

09.43.595

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.540.
Venue.

An application to the court under AS

09.43.320

shall be made in the court of the judicial district in which the agreement to arbitrate specifies the arbitration hearing is to be held or, if the hearing has been held, in the court of the judicial district in which it was held. Otherwise, the application may be made in the court of a judicial district in which an adverse party resides or has a place of business or, if no adverse party has a residence or place of business in this state, in the court of any judicial district in this state. All subsequent applications shall be made in the court hearing the initial application unless the court otherwise directs.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 8(c), ch. 170, SLA 2004 provides that the 2004 enactment of this section has the effect of amending Rule 3, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, by establishing different venue rules for applications to the court in arbitration proceedings.

Sec. 09.43.550.
Appeals.

An appeal may be taken from

an order denying an application to compel arbitration;

an order granting an application to stay arbitration;

an order confirming or denying confirmation of an award;

an order modifying or correcting an award;

an order vacating an award without directing a rehearing; or

a final judgment entered under AS

09.43.300

—

09.43.595

.

An appeal under this section shall be taken as from an order or a judgment in a civil action.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 8(d), ch. 170, SLA 2004 provides that the 2004 enactment of (a)(1) - (5) of this section have the effect of changing Rule 402, Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure, by providing that an appeal may be taken of interlocutory orders identified in (a) of this section.

Sec. 09.43.560.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing AS

09.43.300

—

09.43.595

, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact the Revised Uniform Arbitration Act.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.570.
Relationship to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

The provisions of AS

09.43.300

—

09.43.595

governing the legal effect, validity, and enforceability of electronic records or electronic signatures, and of contracts performed with the use of the records or signatures shall conform to the requirements of 15 U.S.C. 7002 (Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act).

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.580.
Notice.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

09.43.300

—

09.43.595

, a person gives notice to another person by taking action that is reasonably necessary to inform the other person in the ordinary course of affairs, whether or not the other person acquires knowledge of the notice.

A person has notice if the person has knowledge of the notice or has received notice.

A person receives notice when the notice comes to the person’s attention or the notice is delivered at the person’s place of residence or place of business, or at another location held out by the person as a place of delivery of the communications.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.590.
Definitions.

In AS

09.43.300

—

09.43.595

,

“arbitration organization” means an association, agency, board, commission, or other entity that is neutral and initiates, sponsors, or administers an arbitration proceeding or is involved in the appointment of an arbitrator;

“arbitrator” means an individual who is appointed to render an award, alone or with others, in a controversy that is subject to an agreement to arbitrate;

“court” means a court of competent jurisdiction in this state;

“knowledge” means actual knowledge;

“person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, or government; governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality; public corporation; or another legal or commercial entity;

“record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and may be retrieved in perceivable form.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.43.595.
Short title.

AS

09.43.300

—

09.43.595

may be cited as the Revised Uniform Arbitration Act.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 2004)